Utah statutes.
59-2-1366.   Apportionment of redemption or assignment money.
(1)  If property sold to the county under this title is redeemed, or the
certificate of sale is assigned, the money received on account of the
redemption or assignment shall be distributed as follows: the original and
subsequent taxes, and 40% of interest, penalty, and costs of sale received
shall be apportioned to the taxing entities interested, in proportion to their
respective taxes, and the balance shall be paid to the county.
(2)  If a sum less than the taxes, interest, penalty, and costs is accepted in
settlement, the proceeds of the settlement shall be applied, first to the
payment of the original and subsequent taxes, and the remainder, if any, to
the payment of interest, penalty, and costs.
